Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.240

International student exchange.

(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall annually make available to school districts and approved private schools, from data supplied by the secretary of state, the names of international student exchange visitor placement organizations registered under chapter 19.166 RCW to place students in public schools in the state and a summary of the information the organizations have filed with the secretary of state under chapter 19.166 RCW.

(2) The superintendent shall provide general information and assistance to school districts regarding international student exchange visitors, including, to the extent feasible with available resources, information on the type of visa required for enrollment, how to promote positive educational experiences for visiting exchange students, and how to integrate exchange students into the school environment to benefit the education of both the exchange students and students in the state.

[ 1991 c 128 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1991 c 128: See RCW 19.166.901.